Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 16 Wyoming Business Corporation Act

Cross references. —

As to transition of for profit corporations to nonprofit status, see §

17-19-1806

.

As to transition of mutual benefit corporations to for profit status, see §

17-19-1807

.

As to the investment of trust funds in private corporations, see art. 3, § 38, Wyo. Const.

As to corporations generally, see art. 10, Wyo. Const.

As to action of quo warranto against a corporation or against an association of persons who act as a corporation, see §§

1-31-101

and

1-31-102

.

As to false representation of value of shares, bonds or property, see §

6-3-613

.

For authority of state geologist to cooperate with United States, departments of the state, the University of Wyoming or private corporations in the matter of geological, topographic, soil and mineral surveys, see §

9-2-803

.

For authority of Wyoming Business Council to provide assistance to businesses, see §§

9-12-104

through

9-12-106

.

As to the requirement that a bank be a corporation, see §

13-1-101

.

As to waterworks franchises to private corporations, see §

15-7-701

et seq.

As to general corporation laws not being applicable to foreign insurers, see §

26-3-119

.

As to general corporation law applying to domestic stock and domestic mutual insurers, see §

26-24-102

.

As to special benefits to corporations with reference to proposed work in connection with drainage districts, see §

41-9-218

.

Revision of title. —

See note under same catchline following title 17 heading.

Sources of annotations. —

Many of the cases cited in the annotations appearing under the sections of this chapter were taken from cases decided under former similar statutory provisions. They have been retained where it was felt they would be helpful.

Law reviews. —

For an address on revision of corporate law in Wyoming, see XIV Wyo. L.J. 86 (1959).

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

For note on piercing the corporate veil in Wyoming, see XVII Wyo. L.J. 63 (1962).

For article, “Close Corporations and the Wyoming Business Corporation Act: Time for a Change?”, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 537 (1977).

For article, “How Documentation Aids Tax Planning for the General Practitioner's Closely Held Corporate Practice,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 121 (1979).

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

For article, “Corporate Disloyalty — A Wyoming Case and the ALI Project,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 111 (1986).

For comment, “Wyoming Business Corporation Act: Is it Time for a Change?” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 523 (1987).

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act and Close Corporation Supplement,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

18 Am. Jur. 2d Corporations § 1 et seq.

Rights and liability of promoters or incorporators inter se under their contract for issuance of stock to them in return for services, 8 ALR2d 722.

Applicability of statutes regulating sale of assets or property of corporation as affected by purpose or character of corporation, 9 ALR2d 1306.

Interlocutory mandatory injunction to compel surrender of possession of corporate property, 15 ALR2d 213.

Purposes and character which warrant creation of nonprofit corporation, 16 ALR2d 1345.

Validity of contract between corporations as affected by directors or officers in common, 114 ALR 299.

Personal liability of promoter to third person on or with respect to contract made for corporation or in aid of promotion, 41 ALR2d 477.

Who may assert invalidity of sale, mortgage or other disposition of corporate property without approval of stockholders, 58 ALR2d 784.

Liability of corporation for torts of subsidiary, 7 ALR3d 1343.

Liability of holding corporation on contracts of subsidiary, 38 ALR3d 1102.

Leasing of chattels as doing business within state, 50 ALR3d 1020.

Ademption of legacy of interest in business, 65 ALR3d 541.

What business opportunities are in “line of business” of corporation for purposes of determining whether a corporate opportunity was presented, 77 ALR3d 961.

Controlling stockholder's duty to investigate intent and motive of purchaser before selling stock, 77 ALR3d 1005.

Validity, construction and effect of bequest of property owned by corporation in which testator has majority interest, 78 ALR3d 963.

Power of corporation to make political contribution or expenditure under state law, 79 ALR3d 491.

Corporation's liability to criminal prosecution as affected by punishment or penalty imposed, 80 ALR3d 1220.

Right of corporation to discharge employee who asserts rights as stockholder, 84 ALR3d 1107.

Corporate officer's tort liability, 90 ALR3d 916.

Successor products liability: form of business organization of successor or predecessor as affecting successor liability, 32 ALR4th 196.

Reinstatement of repealed, forfeited, expired or suspended corporate charter as validating interim acts of corporation, 42 ALR4th 392.

Corporation's criminal liability for homicide, 45 ALR4th 1021.

Liability of owner or operator of shopping center, or business housed therein, for injury to patron on premises from criminal attack by third party, 31 ALR5th 550.

Liability of independent accountant to investors or shareholders, 48 ALR5th 389.

18 C.J.S. Corporations § 1 et seq.; 47A C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 369 to 412.